Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.520

Appeals.

The board created in RCW 29A.04.510 shall review appeals filed under RCW 29A.04.550 or 29A.04.570. A decision of the board regarding the appeal must be supported by not less than a majority of the members appointed to the board. A decision of the board regarding an appeal filed under RCW 29A.04.570 concerning an election review conducted under that section is final. If a decision of the board regarding an appeal filed under RCW 29A.04.550 includes a recommendation that a certificate be issued, the secretary of state, upon the recommendation of the board, shall issue the certificate.

[ 2003 c 111 s 150.]